Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL HEALTH ADVISORY COMMITTEE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin School Health Advisory Committee established. new text end new text begin A School Health Advisory Committee is established to advise the governor and legislature on policies and practices related to school health. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory committee must review and recommend to the governor, legislature, and state agencies policies and programs that: new text end new text begin (1) are effective in safeguarding and promoting the health of children at school; new text end new text begin (2) prevent or remediate health barriers to learning; new text end new text begin (3) include accurate health status appraisals and documentation of the needs of children; new text end new text begin (4) include evidence-based school nursing services and health services provided by professional school nurses and unlicensed assistive personnel; and new text end new text begin (5) align with the standards of practice for school nursing practice. new text end new text begin (b) The advisory committee must identify essential student health data to collect and report annually the health needs of Minnesota children in schools, including but not limited to the health needs of students with special needs or health conditions and students with barriers to learning. The advisory committee must identify inefficient or ineffective health or educational practices and recommend remediation. new text end new text begin (c) The advisory committee must establish a safe, effective, and coordinated model of school services for children with chronic and acute health conditions, including but not limited to asthma, diabetes, severe allergic reactions, and epilepsy, that facilitates a sustained school environment and protects the health of children while supporting their academic achievement. new text end new text begin (d) The advisory committee must establish a model of school services that facilitates coordinated care between medical and health care systems and schools, including timely communication of a child's health status and the impact of health status on learning and other educational challenges. new text end new text begin (e) The advisory committee must recommend funding streams for school health services, including public funding such as medical assistance reimbursement, private insurers, universal health care funding, and community prevention initiatives. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) Members of the advisory committee must be appointed by the governor for terms of two years. Members must be appointed by September 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) Appointed members must represent the following: new text end new text begin (1) three registered nurses or licensed school nurses; new text end new text begin (2) one public health nurse serving in a school; new text end new text begin (3) one pediatrician; new text end new text begin (4) one family practice physician; new text end new text begin (5) one pediatric nurse practitioner; new text end new text begin (6) one health care provider specialized in chronic or complex health conditions; new text end new text begin (7) one child or adolescent mental health practitioner; new text end new text begin (8) one student services educator, school psychologist, school social worker, school counselor, or school chemical health specialist; new text end new text begin (9) one school board member; new text end new text begin (10) one school administrator; new text end new text begin (11) one special education administrator; new text end new text begin (12) two parents of different children with special health care needs; new text end new text begin (13) one representative of the Minnesota Board of Nursing; new text end new text begin (14) one administrator from the Department of Education; new text end new text begin (15) one administrator from the Department of Health; and new text end new text begin (16) four legislators, two members of the house of representatives and two members of the senate. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings and reporting. new text end new text begin The advisory committee must meet monthly for the first year and at least quarterly thereafter. By January 15 of each year, the advisory committee must report to the governor's office and the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and kindergarten through grade 12 on their guidance for policies and practices related to school health. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin The advisory committee must be administratively supported by the Departments of Education and Health with assistance from the Board of Nursing. new text end